spa/src/Affixes.lexc
(vered)	Na;
(verg)	Na;
(vergel)	Nzero;
(vergüenz)	Na;
(verij)	Na;
(verrug)	Na;
(vers)	No;
(versión)	Nzero;
(vesani)	Na;
(vestid)	No;
(vet)	Na;
(vexilologí)	Na;
(viaduct)	No;
(viaj)	Ne;
(viand)	Na;
(vicari)	No;
(vici)	No;
(vid)	Na;
(vident)	Ne;
(vidri)	No;
(vient)	No;
(vientr)	Ne;
(vig)	Na;
(vigor)	Nzero;
(vill)	Na;
(villan)	No;
(vin)	No;
(vinagr)	Ne;
(vinil)	No;
(viol)	Na;
(violenci)	Na;
(violoncel)	No;
(violín)	Nzero;
(virgen)	Nzero;
(virrein)	No;
(virrey)	Nzero;
(virus)	Nzero;
(vis)	No;
(visaj)	Ne;
(visit)	Na;
(visión)	Nzero;
(visor)	Nzero;
(vitamin)	Na;
(vitrin)	Na;
(vitriol)	No;
(vituall)	Na;
(viud)	Na;
(vivaqu)	Ne;
(vizcach)	Na;
(viñ)	Na;
(viñet)	Na;
(vocación)	Nzero;
(voivod)	Na;
(volant)	Ne;
(volcán)	Nzero;
(volcánic)	No;
(voleibol)	Nzero;
(volti)	No;
(vot)	No;
(voz)	Nzero;
(vuel)	No;
(vuelc)	No;
(vuelt)	Na;
(vulv)	Na;
(válvul)	Na;
(vándal)	No;
(vértebr)	Na;
(ví)	Na;
(víbor)	Na;
(víctim)	Na;
(víde)	No;
(víncul)	No;
(vírgul)	Na;
(vísper)	Na;
(vítor)	Nzero;
(vómit)	No;
(wasap)	Nzero;
(waterpol)	No;
(watt)	Nzero;
(whisky)	Nzero;
(wiki)	Nzero;
(xantin)	Na;
(xat)	Ne;
(xerografí)	Na;
(xifoides)	Nzero;
(xilografí)	Na;
(xilófon)	No;
(yan)	Na;
(yat)	Ne;
(ye)	Nzero;
(yegu)	Na;
(yerb)	Na;
(yern)	No;
(yes)	No;
(yesc)	Na;
(yeyun)	No;
(yihad)	Nzero;
(yo)	Nzero;
(yod)	No;
(yog)	Na;
(yogur)	Nzero;
(yogurt)	Nzero;
(yuc)	Na;
(yug)	No;
(yuy)	No;
(zacat)	Ne;
(zafr)	Na;
(zag)	Na;
(zagal)	Nzero;
(zalam)	Na;
(zamarr)	Na;
(zambomb)	Na;
(zanc)	Na;
(zap)	Na;
(zapall)	No;
(zapat)	No;
(zapot)	Ne;
(zar)	Nzero;
(zaraband)	Na;
(zarp)	Na;
(zarrapastr)	No;
(zarri)	Na;
(zarz)	Na;
(zarzagán)	Nzero;
(zebr)	Na;
(zed)	Na;
(zeugm)	Na;
(zigzag)	Nzero;
(zircón)	Nzero;
(zoc)	No;
(zodiac)	No;
(zodíac)	No;
(zon)	Na;
(zoologí)	Na;
(zootecni)	Na;
(zorr)	Na;
(zorr)	No;
(zorzal)	Nzero;
(zulaqu)	Ne;
(zull)	Na;
(zum)	No;
(zurrap)	Na;
(zurriag)	Na;
(zurriag)	No;
(zuz)	No;
(zángan)	No;
(Álav)	Na;
(Álvar)	No;
(Áncash)	Nzero;
(Ángel)	Nzero;
(Ávil)	Na;
(Écij)	Na;
(Íñig)	No;
(Ñeembucú)	Nzero;
(Ñubl)	Ne;
(Ónub)	Na;
(ácid)	No;
(ágat)	Na;
(águil)	Na;
(álam)	No;
(álbum)	Nzero;
(álcali)	Nzero;
(álgebr)	Na;
(álo)	Ne;
(ámbar)	Nzero;
(ámpul)	Na;
(ánad)	Ne;
(áncor)	Na;
(ángel)	Nzero;
(ángul)	No;
(ánim)	Na;
(ánim)	No;
(ánod)	No;
(ánsar)	Nzero;
(ápic)	Ne;
(árbitr)	No;
(árbol)	Nzero;
(áre)	Na;
(átom)	No;
(éban)	No;
(églog)	Na;
(élit)	Ne;
(émbol)	No;
(énfasis)	Nzero;
(éster)	Nzero;
(éxit)	No;
(éxtasis)	Nzero;
(ídol)	No;
(íleon)	Nzero;
(índic)	Ne;
(ínterin)	Nzero;
(ñañ)	Na;
(ñoqui)	Nzero;
(óle)	No;
(ópal)	No;
(óper)	Na;
(órgan)	No;
(ósmosis)	Nzero;
(óvul)	No;
(óxid)	No;
(úve)	Na;
(γραμμή)	Nzero;
(κριτός)	Nzero;
(λυτός)	Nzero;
(πλαστός)	Nzero;
(σπορά)	Nzero;
(στάσις)	Nzero;
(τύπος)	Nzero;
(φαίνω)	Nzero;
(ϕóρος)	Nzero;

LEXICON RRoot
(abajo)	Rzero;
(adelante)	Rzero;
(adentro)	Rzero;
(adrede)	Rzero;
(ahora)	Rzero;
(algo)	Rzero;
(anoche)	Rzero;
(antarca)	Rzero;
(antaño)	Rzero;
(antier)	Rzero;
(apenas)	Rzero;
(arredro)	Rzero;
(cerca)	Rzero;
(cual)	Rzero;
(delante)	Rzero;
(denantes)	Rzero;
(dentro)	Rzero;
(despacio)	Rzero;
(donde)	Rzero;
(franco)	Rzero;
(fuera)	Rzero;
(lejos)	Rzero;
(mancomún)	Rzero;
(mejor)	Rzero;
(porfa)	Rzero;
(seguro)	Rzero;

LEXICON Prefixes
a-	RRoot;
ante-	RRoot;
des-	RRoot;
en-	RRoot;
geo-	RRoot;
